Utah statutes.
48-2c-406.   Actions not requiring amendment.

A company is not required to amend its articles of organization to report a change in:

(1)  the street or mailing address of a manager in a manager-managed company or member in a member-managed company;

(2)  the legal name of a manager in a manager-managed company or a member in a member-managed company; or

(3)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1).



Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

